zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 手球: 手球用球; 團隊手球護具; 手球訓練輔助用具
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Handball: Ballons de handball; Équipement de protection de handball; Aides à l’entraînement au handball en équipe
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хандбал: Топки за хандбал; Защитна екипировка за отборен хандбал; Помощни средства за тренировка по хандбал
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Andebol: Bolas de andebol; Equipamento de proteção de andebol; Auxiliares de treino para andebol em equipa
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Teamhandbal: Handballen; Beschermende kleding voor handbal; Trainingshulpmiddelen voor teamhandbal
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka ręczna: Piłki do piłki ręcznej; Sprzęt ochronny do piłki ręcznej; Pomoce treningowe do piłki ręcznej
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Handball: Handbälle; Handball-Schutzausrüstung; Handball-Trainingshilfen
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng ném: Bóng để ném; Đồ bảo hộ bóng ném; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện bóng ném
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Handebol: Bolas de handebol; Equipamentos de proteção para handebol; Auxílios de treinamento para handebol
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Käsipallo: Käsipallot; Käsipallon suojavarusteet; Käsipallon harjoitteluvälineet
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Team Handball: Handballs; Team Handball Protective Gear; Team Handball Training Aids
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Komandinis rankinis: Rankinio kamuoliai; Rankinio apsauginė įranga; Komandinio rankinio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χάντμπολ: Μπάλες χάντμπολ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χάντμπολ; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης χάντμπολ
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Гандбол: Гандбольные мячи; Защитная экипировка для гандбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для гандбола
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Takım Hentbolu: Hentbol Topları; Hentbol koruyucu ekipmanları; Takım Hentbolu Eğitim Araçları
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Håndball: Håndballer; Beskyttelsesutstyr for håndball; Treningshjelpemidler for håndball
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Tímová hádzaná: Lopty na hádzanú; Ochranné vybavenie pre tímovú hádzanú; Tréningové pomôcky pre tímovú hádzanú
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Csapatkézilabda: Kézilabdák; Kézilabda védőfelszerelés; Csapatkézilabda edzési segédeszközök
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Rukomet: Rukometne lopte; Zaštitna oprema za rukomet; Pomagala za rukometni trening
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ハンドボール用品: ハンドボール; チームハンドボール用プロテクター; チームハンドボール練習器具
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 팀 핸드볼: 핸드볼; 팀 핸드볼 보호 장비; 팀 핸드볼 훈련 장비
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Balonmano: Balones de balonmano; Equipo de protección para balonmano; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de balonmano en equipo
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Handbal în echipă: Mingi de handbal; Echipament de protecție pentru handbal; Articole antrenament handbal în echipă
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pallamano in squadra: Palloni da pallamano; Attrezzatura protettiva per pallamano; Ausili per l'allenamento della squadra di pallamano
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Handboll: Handbollar; Skyddsutrustning för handboll; Träningshjälpmedel för handboll
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ekipni rokomet: Rokometne žoge; Zaščitna oprema za rokomet; Pripomočki za vadbo ekipnega rokometa
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Håndbold: Håndbolde; Beskyttelsesudstyr til håndbold; Træningshjælpemidler til håndbold
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Týmová házená: Míče na házenou; Ochranné pomůcky na házenou; Tréninkové pomůcky na týmovou házenou
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 手球: 手球用球; 手球护具; 团队手球训练辅助用品
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แฮนด์บอลทีม: แฮนด์บอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันแฮนด์บอล; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมแฮนด์บอลทีม